Florida, session 2026, HB453.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subsection (3) and paragraph
(b) of subsection (8) of section 1003.4282, Florida Statutes,
are amended to read:
1003.4282 Requirements for a standard high school
diploma.—
(3) STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA; COURSE AND ASSESSMENT
REQUIREMENTS.—
(f) One credit in physical education.—Physical education
must include the integration of health. Participation in an
interscholastic sport at the junior varsity or varsity level for
two full seasons shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in
physical education. A district school board may not require that
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb453 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 453 2026 Legislature
the one credit in physical education be taken during the 9th
grade year. Completion of 2 years of marching band shall satisfy
the one-credit requirement in physical education and or the one-
credit requirement in performing arts. This credit may not be
used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the
requirement for adaptive physical education under an individual
education plan (IEP) or 504 plan. Completion of one semester
with a grade of "C" or better in a marching band class, in a
physical activity class that requires participation in marching
band activities as an extracurricular activity, or in a dance
class shall satisfy one-half credit in physical education or
one-half credit in performing arts. This credit may not be used
to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or the requirement
for adaptive physical education under an IEP or 504 plan.
Completion of 2 years in a Reserve Officer Training Corps
(R.O.T.C.) class, a significant component of which is drills,
shall satisfy the one-credit requirement in physical education
and the one-credit requirement in performing arts. This credit
may not be used to satisfy the personal fitness requirement or
the requirement for adaptive physical education under an IEP or
504 plan.
(8) STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES.—Beginning with students
entering grade 9 in the 2014-2015 school year, this subsection
applies to a student with a disability.
(b) The following options, in addition to the other
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb453 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 453 2026 Legislature
options specified in this section, may be used to satisfy the
standard high school diploma requirements, as specified in the
student's individual education plan:
1. For a student with a disability for whom the IEP team
has determined that the Florida Alternate Assessment is the most
appropriate measure of the student's skills:
a. A combination of course substitutions, assessments,
industry certifications, other acceleration options, or
occupational completion points appropriate to the student's
unique skills and abilities that meet the criteria established
by State Board of Education rule.
b. A portfolio of quantifiable evidence that documents a
student's mastery of academic standards through rigorous metrics
established by State Board of Education rule. A portfolio may
include, but is not limited to, documentation of work
experience, internships, community service, and postsecondary
credit.
2. A student with a disability may participate in the
Special Olympics as a course substitution for the physical
education requirement under paragraph (3)(f). A student who
chooses this option must participate in the Special Olympics for
one school year, as determined by the student's IEP team.
3. For a student with a disability for whom the IEP team
has determined that mastery of academic and employment
competencies is the most appropriate way for a student to
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb453 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 453 2026 Legislature
demonstrate his or her skills:
a. Documented completion of the minimum high school
graduation requirements, including the number of course credits
prescribed by rules of the State Board of Education.
b. Documented achievement of all annual goals and short-
term objectives for academic and employment competencies,
industry certifications, and occupational completion points
specified in the student's transition plan. The documentation
must be verified by the IEP team.
c. Documented successful employment for the number of
hours per week specified in the student's transition plan, for
the equivalent of 1 semester, and payment of a minimum wage in
compliance with the requirements of the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act.
d. Documented mastery of the academic and employment
competencies, industry certifications, and occupational
completion points specified in the student's transition plan.
The documentation must be verified by the IEP team, the
employer, and the teacher. The transition plan must be developed
and signed by the student, parent, teacher, and employer before
placement in employment and must identify the following:
(I) The expected academic and employment competencies,
industry certifications, and occupational completion points;
(II) The criteria for determining and certifying mastery
100 of the competencies;
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb453 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 453 2026 Legislature
101 (III) The work schedule and the minimum number of hours to
102 be worked per week; and
103 (IV) A description of the supervision to be provided by
104 the school district.
105 4.3. Any change to the high school graduation option
106 specified in the student's IEP must be approved by the parent
107 and is subject to verification for appropriateness by an
108 independent reviewer selected by the parent as provided in s.
109 1003.572.
110
111 The State Board of Education shall adopt rules under ss.
112 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this subsection, including
113 rules that establish the minimum requirements for students
114 described in this subsection to earn a standard high school
115 diploma. The State Board of Education shall adopt emergency
116 rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54.
117 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb453 -01-er